Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 9. Loans and Investments.

§ 6.2-1370.
Purpose and condition of loans.

A credit union may lend to its members for such purposes and upon such conditions as the bylaws may prescribe. The board of directors shall establish written policies with respect to granting loans and extending lines of credit, including the terms, conditions, and acceptable forms of security.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-207; 1956, c. 90; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-198; 1968, c. 560; 1980, c. 181; 1983, c. 300; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.51; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1371.
Other charges.

In addition to interest charged on loans, a credit union may charge members all reasonable expenses in connection with making, closing, disbursing, extending, collecting, or renewing loans.

In accordance with the bylaws, a credit union may assess charges to members for failure to meet in a timely manner their obligations to the credit union.

History.

1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.52; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1372.
Loan limits.

No loan may be made by a credit union to a member if, upon making the loan, the member would be indebted to the credit union on loans to such member in an aggregate amount which would exceed the lesser of (i) 10 percent of the credit union’s share accounts and reserve fund or (ii) the maximum amount as authorized by its bylaws.

The aggregate amount of a credit union’s “member business loans,” as defined in 12 C.F.R. § 701.21 (h), shall not exceed the limit prescribed for insured credit unions by subsection (a) of § 107A of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. § 1757a), taking into account also the provisions of subsections (b) through (d) of that section.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-226; 1956, c. 90; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-217; 1968, c. 560; 1972, c. 192; 1975, c. 448; 1979, c. 139; 1987, c. 150; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.53; 1999, c. 63; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1373.
Loans to members of credit committee; nonmember loans.

If the borrower or endorser on a loan by a credit union is a member of the credit committee, or a member of the board of directors if the board is serving as the credit committee, the loan shall be approved by the supervisory committee or a loan officer instead of by the credit committee. If the loan is fully secured by shares, such loan may be approved by the credit committee.

No loan shall be made to an individual or entity that is not a member of the credit union. If the credit committee or loan officer should knowingly approve such a loan, the members of the credit committee shall be jointly and severally liable, or in the case of a loan officer, he shall be individually liable, to the credit union for the immediate repayment thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-226; 1956, c. 90; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-217; 1968, c. 560; 1972, c. 192; 1975, c. 448; 1979, c. 139; 1987, c. 150; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.54; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1374.
Lines of credit.

Notwithstanding the requirements of §

6.2-1354

, the credit committee or a loan officer may approve an application for a line of credit. When a line of credit has been approved, advances may be made as requested without further loan application or approval if the aggregate outstanding balance on all advances does not exceed the limit specified.

History.

1976, c. 204, § 6.1-212.1; 1986, c. 147; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.55; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1375.
Cooperative loans.

A credit union may originate loans to credit union members jointly with other credit unions, credit union organizations, or other financial institutions pursuant to written policies established by the board of directors. The policies shall include the limitation set forth in §

6.2-1372

. A credit union that originates such a loan shall retain at least a 10 percent interest in such loan.

History.

1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.56; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1376.
Authorized investments.

The funds of a credit union that are not used in loans to members may be invested only:

In loans to other insured credit unions to the extent permitted in the bylaws;

In shares, share accounts, or deposits of other insured credit unions to the extent authorized in its bylaws, but not to exceed 25 percent of the investing credit union’s outstanding shares and reserve fund;

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, in shares or deposits of any corporate credit union provided such investments are specifically authorized by the board of directors making the investment;

In federally insured banks and savings institutions;

In the capital stock of the National Credit Union Central Liquidity Facility or any central liquidity facility established under the laws of the Commonwealth;

In obligations of the United States and securities fully guaranteed as to principal and interest thereby;

In obligations of the Commonwealth and any political subdivision thereof, including, but not limited to, revenue bonds;

In such stock, securities, obligations, or other investments as may be approved from time to time by the Commission;

In real estate, office buildings, equipment, and furnishings of the credit union, provided that the aggregate investment in all such fixed assets shall not exceed five percent of the total of the members’ share accounts and retained earnings without the prior written authorization of the Commissioner;

In shares, stock, deposits in, loans, or other obligations of any credit union service organization, corporation, or association, if (i) the membership or ownership, as the case may be, of such organization, corporation, or association is primarily confined or restricted to credit unions or organizations of credit unions and (ii) the purpose for which such organization, corporation, or association is organized is to strengthen or advance the development of credit unions or credit union organizations. Such investment by any credit union shall not exceed five percent of the credit union’s outstanding shares and reserves without the prior approval of the Commissioner;

In deposits in, loans to, or shares of any Federal Reserve Bank; and

In cooperative loans with other credit unions or credit union organizations. Such investment shall not exceed 10 percent of outstanding shares and reserves of the investing credit union.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-225; 1956, c. 90; 1958, c. 21; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-216; 1968, c. 560; 1972, c. 192; 1974, c. 117; 1975, c. 35; 1979, c. 190; 1980, cc. 207, 210; 1983, c. 466; 1984, c. 351; 1990, c. 373, § 6.1-225.57; 1991, c. 367; 2010, c. 794; 2013, cc. 16, 92.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 16 and 92 are identical, and inserted “and retained earnings” near the end of subdivision 9.